North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-03 Legislative Assembly
54-03-01.15.
Staggering of terms of members of the legislative assembly.

A senator must be elected from each odd-numbered district in 2022 for a term of four years.

Two representatives must be elected from each odd-numbered district not comprised of subdistricts in 2022 for a term of four years.

A representative must be elected from each odd-numbered subdistrict in 2022 for a term of four years.

A senator and two representatives from districts ten and twenty-six must be elected in 2022 for a term of two years.

A senator must be elected from each even-numbered district in 2024 for a term of four years.

Two representatives must be elected from each even-numbered district not comprised of subdistricts in 2024 for a term of four years.

A representative must be elected from each even-numbered subdistrict in 2022 for a term of two years and in 2024 for a term of four years.

The term of office of a representative elected in 2020 from an even-numbered district who as a result of redistricting is placed in an even-numbered district with more than one other representative elected in 2020 from an even-numbered district terminates December 1, 2022, and two representatives must be elected from that district in 2022 for a term of two years.

The term of office of a senator elected in 2020 from an even-numbered district who as a result of redistricting is placed in an even-numbered district with one or more other senators elected in 2020 from an even-numbered district terminates December 1, 2022, and one senator must be elected from that district in 2022 for a term of two years.

The term of office of a member of the legislative assembly elected in an even-numbered district in 2020 for a term of four years and who as a result of legislative redistricting is placed in an odd-numbered district terminates December 1, 2022.

The term of office of a member of the legislative assembly elected in a district comprised of subdistricts as a result of legislative redistricting terminates on December 1, 2022.

Except as provided in subsection 7, a member of the legislative assembly elected from an even-numbered district in 2020 for a term of four years and who as a result of legislative redistricting is placed in an odd-numbered district may continue to serve the remainder of the term for which the member was elected beyond December 1, 2022, if the member changes the member’s place of residence by February 1, 2022, to a location within the even-numbered district from which the member was elected and certifies in writing to the secretary of state and the chairman of the legislative management the member has established a new residence in that district as determined by section 54-01-26. If the member does not establish residency within the district from which the member was elected by February 1, 2022, the term of office of the member terminates on December 1, 2022.

The term of office of a member of the legislative assembly in an even-numbered district with new geographic area which area was not in that member’s district for the 2020 election and which new geographic area has a 2020 population more than four thousand one hundred forty-four terminates on December 1, 2022.

For purposes of section 5 of article IV of the Constitution of North Dakota, a member of the legislative assembly elected from a district with boundaries that changed as a result of legislative redistricting is deemed to live in the district from which the member was elected until December 1, 2022.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 563, § 2, effective November 12, 2021.

54-03-02.
When legislative assembly meets.

The legislative assembly shall meet at the seat of government in the month of December following the election of the members thereof for organizational and orientation purposes and shall thereafter recess until the time provided in subsection 2.

The legislative assembly shall reconvene at twelve noon on the first Tuesday after the third day in January of the year following the organizational session as provided in subsection 1 or at twelve noon on a date selected by the legislative management but not earlier than January second nor later than January eleventh of the year following the organizational session and, following the close of business of the regular session, shall adjourn subject to subsection 3.

Notwithstanding a motion to adjourn sine die, the legislative assembly shall reconvene as determined by the legislative management. The number of natural days used may not exceed the number of natural days available under the constitution which have not been previously used by that legislative assembly in regular session under subsection 2.

Source:

N.D. Const., § 53; R.C. 1895, § 20; R.C. 1899, § 20; R.C. 1905, § 20; C.L. 1913, § 26; R.C. 1943, § 54-0302; S.L. 1969, ch. 427, § 2; 1973, ch. 408, § 1; 1979, ch. 534, § 1; 1987, ch. 259, § 10; 1995, ch. 494, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, §
37.

54-03-02.1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 54-03.1:

“Organizational session” means the meeting of the legislative assembly for organizational and orientation purposes held during the month of December in the even-numbered years.

“Regular session” means the legislative session commencing in January of the odd-numbered years and includes any reconvened legislative session, as provided in section 54-03-02.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 427, § 1; 1979, ch. 534, § 2; 1995, ch. 494, § 2.

54-03-02.2.
Virtual session of the legislative management and legislative assembly during emergency or disaster.

If the legislative management meets to vote on whether the legislative management should request the governor call a special session of the legislative assembly, the legislative management may use any technology or electronic means available to conduct meetings and transact legislative business.

If the governor calls a special session of the legislative assembly to address a state of emergency or disaster or if the legislative assembly reconvenes to address a state of emergency or disaster, the legislative assembly may use any technology or electronic means available to conduct meetings and transact legislative business.

For purposes of section 7 of article IV of the Constitution of North Dakota, a meeting of the legislative assembly which occurs under this section is deemed to have occurred at the seat of the government, and all actions taken during the meeting have the same legal effect as if the members of the legislative assembly were physically present at the seat of government.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 191, § 4, effective April 22, 2021.

54-03-03.
Secretary of senate and chief clerk of house to receive certifications and to make roll of members — Certificates filed.

At the opening of each organizational session, reconvened session, or special session of the legislative assembly, the secretary of state shall certify to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives the respective members to whom certificates of election have been issued or whose appointments have been filed with the secretary of state under applicable provisions of law since the preceding session of the legislative assembly. The secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house of representatives shall file the certifications and copies of the certificates of election or appointment, and the certifications and copies of the certificates of election or appointment are prima facie evidence of the right to membership in the respective branch of the legislative assembly of the person certified therein. The secretary of state shall also certify to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives the respective members who served in the preceding session of the legislative assembly and whose terms have not expired. After the certifications are received, the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall call and make a correct roll of the names of those respective members who have been certified by the secretary of state. The provisions of this section may not be construed to infringe on the right of each house to be the judge of the qualifications of its members.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 14; R.C. 1895, § 21; R.C. 1899, § 21; R.C. 1905, § 21; C.L. 1913, § 27; R.C. 1943, § 54-0303; S.L. 1969, ch. 427, § 3; 2003, ch. 457, § 1.

54-03-04.
Organizational session — Calling to order — Officers — Term of office — Officers and chairmen to remain in office during special session.

The secretary and officers of the senate and chief clerk and officers of the house serving at the close of a regular session, unless otherwise removed, shall remain in office until the first day of the organizational session. On the first day of the organizational session, at a time scheduled by the legislative management pursuant to section 54-03.1-02, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house from the previous session, if re-elected, or in the speaker’s absence a member of the majority party of the house with seniority based upon terms of service in the house, shall call the members of their respective houses so enrolled to order. In the absence of the president of the senate, the president pro tempore shall call the members of the senate to order. In the absence of both the president of the senate and the president pro tempore, then some member or other person selected by the members present shall call the members of the senate to order. If the speaker of the house from the previous session is not re-elected and if no party has a majority in the house, the member of the house with seniority based upon terms of service in the house shall call the house to order. If two or more members of the house are tied for seniority and seniority is a factor in determining who shall call the house to order, the persons so tied for seniority shall draw lots to determine who shall call the house to order. The members of the respective houses then may proceed to the election of the necessary officers. The secretary and officers of the senate and chief clerk and officers of the house of representatives, and the chairmen of all procedural and substantive standing legislative committees shall continue to serve in those positions during any special legislative session which may be called, except in case of the death, resignation, or removal of one of those persons, whereupon the position must be filled, upon the convening of the special session, in the manner provided by law or legislative rule. Members serving on procedural or substantive standing committees of the senate or house during a regular session shall continue to serve on those committees during any special legislative session which may be called following that regular session.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 15; R.C. 1895, § 22; R.C. 1899, § 22; R.C. 1905, § 22; C.L. 1913, § 28; R.C. 1943, § 54-0304; S.L. 1969, ch. 427, § 4; 1971, ch. 486, § 1; 1979, ch. 535, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 38.

54-03-05.
Who to administer oath of office to members and officers of the legislative assembly.

The following persons may administer the oath of office to the members and officers of the legislative assembly:

The speaker of the house of representatives.

The president of the senate.

The governor.

A judge of the supreme court.

A judge of the district court.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2; § 6; R.C. 1895, § 25; R.C. 1899, § 25; R.C. 1905, § 25; C.L. 1913, § 31; R.C. 1943, § 54-0305.

54-03-06.
Chairman of committee may administer oath.

Any member of a committee or interim committee of the legislative assembly, while acting as chairman of such committee, may administer oaths to such persons as shall be examined before the committee of which the chairman is a member.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 8; R.C. 1895, § 26; R.C. 1899, § 26; R.C. 1905, § 26; C.L. 1913, § 32; R.C. 1943, § 54-0306; S.L. 1965, ch. 339, § 1.

54-03-07.
Qualifications of members — Each house to judge.

If the qualifications of any member of either house of the legislative assembly are challenged, the right of that member to a seat must be determined by the house in which that person claims a seat as a member, except an election contest must be determined in accordance with chapter 16.1-16.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 27; R.C. 1899, § 27; R.C. 1905, § 27; C.L. 1913, § 33; R.C. 1943, § 54-0307; S.L. 1987, ch. 259, § 11.

54-03-08.
Selection of officers and employees of legislative assembly.

The senate at the beginning and close of each regular session, and at such other times as may be necessary, shall elect one of its members president pro tempore. The house of representatives shall elect one of its members as speaker. Such other officers and employees as are deemed necessary must be elected or appointed by the respective houses.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 11; S.L. 1893, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; 1895, ch. 76, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 28, 29; S.L. 1897, ch. 27, § 1; 1899, ch. 39, § 1; 1899, ch. 104, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1899, §§ 28, 29; S.L. 1901, ch. 117, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 28, 29; S.L. 1907, ch. 164, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 34, 36; S.L. 1935, ch. 212, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 54-0308; S.L. 1951, ch. 304, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 54-0308.

54-03-09.
Oath of officers.

The officers of each house of the legislative assembly must be required to take and subscribe the oath prescribed in section 4 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 11; R.C. 1895, § 29; S.L. 1899, ch. 104, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 29; R.C. 1905, § 29; C.L. 1913, § 36; R.C. 1943, § 54-0309.

54-03-10.
Compensation of speaker, majority and minority leaders, assistant majority and minority leaders, committee chairmen, and employees.

The speaker of the house, the house majority leader, the senate majority leader, the house minority leader, and the senate minority leader shall each receive as compensation, in addition to any other compensation or expense reimbursement provided by law, the sum of fifteen dollars per day for each calendar day during any regular, special, or organizational session. Chairmen of the substantive standing committees, the house assistant majority leader, the senate assistant majority leader, the house assistant minority leader, and the senate assistant minority leader shall receive additional compensation of ten dollars for each calendar day during any regular, special, or organizational session. The additional compensation provided by this section must be paid in the manner provided in section 54-03-20. The legislative assembly, by concurrent resolution, shall fix the compensation of the other officers and employees elected or appointed.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; 1895, ch. 76, § 1; R.C.1895, § 28; S.L. 1897, ch. 27, § 1; 1899, ch. 39, § 1; 1899, ch. 104, § 1; 1899, ch. 190; R.C. 1899, § 28; S.L. 1901, ch. 117, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 28; S.L. 1907, ch. 164, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 34; S.L. 1935, ch. 212, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 54-0310; S.L. 1951, ch. 304, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 54-0310; S.L. 1971, ch. 487, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 125; 1985, ch. 558, § 1; 1989, ch. 630, § 1; 2011, ch. 1, § 7.

54-03-11.
Payment of legislative costs and expenses — President pro tempore of the senate and speaker of the house jointly approve vouchers.

During any legislative session, the speaker of the house and the president pro tempore of the senate, or persons designated by the speaker and the president pro tempore, on behalf of the legislative assembly and without further legislative action, jointly shall approve vouchers for payment of compensation, salaries, and other costs of operation and expenses of the legislative assembly, its committees, and its employees within the limits of legislative appropriations.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 86, § 6; 1895, ch. 76, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 31; R.C. 1899, § 31; R.C. 1905, § 30; C.L. 1913, § 37; R.C. 1943, § 54-0311; S.L. 1969, ch. 428, § 1; 1991, ch. 564, § 1.

54-03-12.
Duties of secretary of senate and chief clerk of house.

The secretary of the senate and chief clerk of the house of representatives shall perform the duties required of them by the rules of the senate and the house of representatives, as appropriate.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 12; R.C. 1895, § 33; R.C. 1899, § 33; R.C. 1905, § 32; C.L. 1913, § 39; R.C. 1943, § 54-0312; S.L. 1991, ch. 565, § 1.

54-03-13.
Duties of secretary of senate and chief clerk of house after legislative session. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 565, § 2.

54-03-14.
Removal of officers or employees.

At any time during a session of the legislative assembly, either house by a majority vote may remove from office any officer or employee. In case of the removal of an officer by either house, that officer’s place must be filled by an election viva voce. In all elections under the provisions of this chapter for officers of either house of the legislative assembly, a majority of all votes cast is necessary.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 17; R.C. 1895, § 35; R.C. 1899, § 35; R.C. 1905, § 34; C.L. 1913, § 41; R.C. 1943, § 54-0314.

54-03-15.
Discharge of officers and employees.

Whenever any officer or employee of the legislative assembly, through neglect or incompetency, fails to discharge the duties of the person’s office or position properly, the body of the legislative assembly in which the person is employed shall declare the office or position vacant and fill the vacancy so created.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 86, § 6; 1895, ch. 76, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 32; R.C. 1899, § 32; R.C. 1905, § 31; C.L. 1913, § 38; R.C. 1943, § 54-0315.

54-03-16.
Legislative expense — Appropriation.

There is appropriated out of any moneys in the state treasury, as a standing and continuing appropriation, such sum as may be necessary to pay:

The mileage and per diem of the members of the legislative assembly;

The per diem of officers and employees of the legislative assembly;

The expense of investigating committees when authorized by the legislative assembly; and

Necessary postage, express, telegrams, telephone, and such other miscellaneous expenses as may be authorized by the legislative assembly, except printing.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1895, § 36; R.C. 1899, § 36; R.C. 1905, § 35; S.L. 1913, ch. 28, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 42; R.C. 1943, § 54-0316.

54-03-17.
Punishment by each house for offenses.

Each house of the legislative assembly may punish, by imprisonment, as for a contempt, any person who is guilty of one or more of the following offenses:

Knowingly arresting a member or officer of the house or procuring such member or officer to be arrested in violation of the member’s or officer’s privilege from arrest.

Disorderly conduct in the immediate view of the house and directly tending to interrupt its proceedings.

Refusing to attend and be examined as a witness either before the house, or a committee thereof, or before any person authorized to take testimony in legislative proceedings.

Giving or offering a bribe to a member or attempting by menace or other corrupt means or device, directly or indirectly, to control or influence a member in giving the member’s vote or to prevent the member giving the same.

The term of imprisonment which such house may impose for any contempt specified in this section may not continue beyond thirty days, nor extend beyond the same session of the legislative assembly.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 4; N.D. Const., § 48; R.C. 1895, § 23; R.C. 1899, § 23; R.C. 1905, § 23; C.L. 1913, § 29; R.C. 1943, § 54-0317.

Collateral References.

Criminal offense of bribery as affected by lack of authority of state public officer or employee, 73 A.L.R.3d 374.

54-03-18.
Penalty.

Any person who commits any offense punishable under section 54-03-17 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 2, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 24; R.C. 1899, § 24; R.C. 1905, § 24; C.L. 1913, § 30; R.C. 1943, § 54-0318; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 574.

54-03-19.
Seal to be affixed to bills. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 30, § 4.

54-03-19.1.
Legislative compensation commission — Appointment of members. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 1.

54-03-19.2.
Meetings — Powers and duties — Expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 387, § 1.

54-03-20.
Compensation and expense reimbursement of members of the legislative assembly.

Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive as compensation for services the sum of one hundred eighty-nine dollars through June 30, 2022, and one hundred ninety-three dollars thereafter for each calendar day during any organizational, special, or regular legislative session and for each day that member attends a meeting of a legislative committee between the organizational session and the regular session as authorized by legislative rule.

Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive reimbursement for lodging, which may not exceed per calendar month the amount established under this subdivision by the director of the office of management and budget for lodging in state and which may not exceed the rate provided in section 44-08-04 for each calendar day during the period of any organizational, special, or regular session. On August first of each even-numbered year, the director of the office of management and budget shall set the maximum monthly reimbursement for the subsequent two-year period at an amount equal to thirty times seventy percent of the daily lodging reimbursement in effect on that date as provided under subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 44-08-04.

Notwithstanding subdivision a:

A member of the legislative assembly may elect to be reimbursed for less than the amount to which the legislator is entitled under this subsection by claiming the lesser amount on a voucher submitted with the receipt required by section 44-08-04.

The legislative management may establish guidelines that may result in a reduced maximum reimbursement for a single dwelling in which two or more legislators share lodging and the total rent for that dwelling exceeds the amount to which a legislator is entitled under subdivision a.

Members of the legislative assembly who receive reimbursement for lodging are also entitled to reimbursement for travel for not to exceed one round trip taken during any calendar week, or portion of a week, the legislative assembly is in session, between their residences and the place of meeting of the legislative assembly, at the rate provided for state employees with the additional limitation that reimbursement for travel by common carrier may be only at the cost of coach fare and may not exceed one and one-half times the amount the member would be entitled to receive as mileage reimbursement for travel by motor vehicle.

A member of the legislative assembly who does not receive reimbursement for lodging and whose place of residence in the legislative district that the member represents is not within the city of Bismarck is entitled to reimbursement at the rate provided for state employees for necessary travel for not to exceed one round trip taken per day between the residence and the place of meeting of the legislative assembly when it is in session and may receive reimbursement for lodging at the place of meeting of the legislative assembly as provided in section 44-08-04 for each calendar day for which round trip travel reimbursement is not claimed, provided that the total reimbursement may not exceed the maximum monthly reimbursement allowed under subdivision a of subsection 2.

The amount to which each legislator is entitled must be paid following the organizational session in December and each month upon submission of a voucher and appropriate documentation during a regular or special session, consistent with section 26 of article XI of the constitution of North Dakota.

If during a special session, the legislative assembly adjourns for more than three days, a member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive compensation during those days only while in attendance at a standing committee if the legislator is a member of that committee, a majority or minority leader, or a legislator who is not on that committee but who has the approval of a majority or minority leader to attend.

A day, or portion of a day, spent in traveling to or returning from an organizational, special, or regular session or a legislative committee meeting must be included as a calendar day during a legislative session or as a day of a legislative committee meeting for the purposes of this section.

In addition, each member is entitled to receive during the term for which the member was elected, as compensation for the execution of public duties during the biennium, the sum of five hundred twenty-six dollars through June 30, 2022, and five hundred thirty-seven dollars thereafter per month, paid monthly.

If a member dies or resigns from office during the member’s term, the member may be paid only the allowances provided for in this section for the period for which the member was actually a member.

The majority and minority leaders of the house and senate and the chairman of the legislative management, if the chairman is not a majority or minority leader, are each entitled to receive as compensation, in addition to any other compensation or expense reimbursement provided by law, the sum of three hundred seventy-seven dollars through June 30, 2022, and three hundred eighty-five dollars thereafter per month during the biennium for their execution of public duties.

Attendance at any organizational, special, or regular session of the legislative assembly by any member is a conclusive presumption of entitlement as set out in this section and compensation and expense allowances must be excluded from gross income for income tax purposes to the extent permitted for federal income tax purposes under section 127 of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 [Pub. L. 97-34; 95 Stat. 202; 26 U.S.C. 162(i)].

Before each regular legislative session, the legislative management shall make recommendations and submit any necessary legislation to adjust legislative compensation amounts.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 72, § 1; 1949, ch. 312, § 1; 1957, ch. 334, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 54-0320; S.L. 1959, ch. 368, § 1; 1965, ch. 340, § 1; 1967, ch. 379, § 1; 1969, ch. 426, § 1; 1969, ch. 427, § 5; 1971, ch. 487, § 2; 1973, ch. 409, § 1; 1975, ch. 418, § 2; 1977, ch. 476, § 1; 1979, ch. 536, § 1; 1981, ch. 520, § 1; S.L. 1983, ch. 551, § 1; 1985, ch. 558, § 2; 1987, ch. 620, § 1; 1989, ch. 630, § 2; 1989, ch. 631, § 1; 1991, ch. 566, § 1; 1993, ch. 505, § 3; 1997, ch. 433, § 1; 1997, ch. 434, § 1; 1997, ch. 435, § 1; 1999, ch. 442, § 1; 2001, ch. 26, § 3; 2001, ch. 467, § 1; 2001, ch. 468, § 1; 2003 Sp., ch. 668, § 1; 2005, ch. 15, § 17; 2005, ch. 29, § 10; 2005, ch. 472, § 1; 2007, ch. 453, §§ 1, 2, 3, 4.; 2007, ch. 1, §§ 9, 10; 2009, ch. 29, §§
9, 10; 2009, ch. 386, §§ 2-6; 2009, ch. 482, §§
40, 97; 2011, ch. 1, §§ 8, 9; 2011, ch. 41, § 26; 2013, ch. 32, §§ 6, 7; 2015, ch. 366, § 1, effective March 26, 2015; 2015, ch. 1, § 6, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 1, §
7, effective April 27, 2015; 2019, ch. 1, § 7, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 1, § 8, effective July 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 29, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 6 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in
section 13 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015 becomes effective July 1, 2016, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 13 of chapter 1, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 366, S.L. 2015 became effective March 26, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in
section 4 of chapter 366, S.L. 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 32, S.L. 2013 becomes effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 32, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2001 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 468, S.L. 2001 is retroactive in application to January 1, 2001, pursuant to section 2 of chapter 468, S.L. 2001.

Note.

Section 54-03-20 was amended 3 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 384, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1001; Section 1 of Chapter 366, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1199; and Section 7 of Chapter 1, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1001.

Section 3 of chapter 668, S.L. 2003, Sp., provides:

“

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION OF ACT.

This Act is retroactive in application to May 4, 2003.”

Section 2 of chapter 467, S.L. 2001, provides: “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

Section 1 of this Act [this section] is retroactive in application to December 7, 2000.”

Cross-References.

Compensation of nursing board members, see N.D.C.C. § 43-12.1-07.

54-03-20.1.
Compensation for attending legislators. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 558, § 4.

54-03-20.2.
Creation of legislative compensation commission — Appointment of members. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 537, § 1.

54-03-20.3.
Meetings — Powers and duties — Expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 537, § 1.

54-03-21.
Conflict of interest — Prohibition — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 380, § 1.

Note.

The supreme court in Melland v. Johanneson, 160 N.W.2d 107 (1968), held that this section made an arbitrary classification denying equal protection of the laws in violation of sections 11 and 20 of the state Constitution (now sections 21 and 22 of article I) and section 1 of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, overruling Lindberg v. Benson, 70 N.W.2d 42 (1955).

54-03-22.
When party or attorney is member of legislative assembly.

A member of the legislative assembly who is a witness or party to a civil action or has been the attorney of record for a party in a civil action for more than fifteen days is entitled to a continuance or an extension of time for any matter related to the civil action during the time the member of the legislative assembly is actually engaged in the performance of the member’s duties at a session of the legislative assembly and attendance of the member of the legislative assembly is necessary in the action. Upon application for the continuance or extension, the proceeding must be continued and may not proceed within ten days after the adjournment of the legislative assembly over the objection of the party, witness, or attorney of record. Notice of motion, together with a copy of an affidavit stating that the party, witness, or the attorney of record is a member of the legislative assembly, must be served upon every other party to the action at least ten days before the date of the matter sought to be continued. It is sufficient cause for the continuance of any proceeding before any board, commission, or agency of the state or its political subdivisions that any witness, party to the proceeding, or a party’s attorney is a member of the legislative assembly and the legislative assembly is in session. The witness, party, or the party’s attorney shall give written notice of the fact of membership in the legislative assembly along with a request for continuance of the proceeding to the board, commission, or agency before which the member of the legislative assembly was to appear. Upon receipt of the notices, the board shall continue the proceeding to a date not less than ten days after adjournment of the legislative assembly and shall notify the other parties to the proceeding, and their attorneys, of the continuance.

Source:

S.L. 1899, ch. 47, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 5722a; R.C. 1905, § 7329; S.L. 1909, ch. 4, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 7949; S.L. 1921, ch. 130, §§ 1, 2; 1925 Supp., §§ 7949, 7949a; R.C. 1943, § 28-1211; S.L. 1969, ch. 430, § 1; 2001, ch. 469, § 1.

Note.

The provisions of section 28-12-11 were reinserted as this section.

Cross-References.

Application for continuance on ground defendant or his attorney is member of legislative assembly, see N.D.C.C. § 29-19-07.

Collateral References.

Counsel’s absence because of attendance on legislature as ground for continuance, 49 A.L.R.2d 1073.

54-03-23.
Century Code distributed to each legislator — Retention.

Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive a current set of the North Dakota Century Code as provided in section 46-04-01. Upon the election of a member of the legislative assembly, the secretary of state shall request of that member whether that member wants to receive a set of the code under this section. The secretary of state shall deliver a set of the code to each member who elects to receive a copy of the code. A legislator who elects to receive a set of the code is entitled to current supplements and volumes as provided in section 46-04-03 to maintain the code during the legislator’s service. The code received by a legislator under this section is not subject to section 46-04-04. After a legislator’s service in the legislative assembly is terminated, the secretary of state shall inform the legislator that the legislator may elect to retain the set of the code or to return the set at the expense of the secretary of state. If the legislator elects to retain the set, the secretary of state shall inform the legislator how to obtain a subscription to maintain the legislator’s code.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 538, § 2; 1995, ch. 495, § 1.

54-03-24.
Administrative code.

Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive electronic notification of quarterly updates to the North Dakota administrative code as provided in section 28-32-20.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 2; 2001, ch. 293, § 27; 2019, ch. 267, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

54-03-25.
Bills and amendments affecting workforce safety and insurance fund — Actuarial impact statement.

Workforce safety and insurance shall review any legislative measure affecting workforce safety and insurance benefits or premium rates to determine whether the measure will have an actuarial impact on the workforce safety and insurance fund. If the organization determines that the measure will have an actuarial impact on the fund, the organization shall submit, before the measure is acted upon, an actuarial impact statement prepared, at the expense of the organization, by the actuary employed by the organization. The organization shall review any amendment affecting workforce safety and insurance benefits or premium rates and shall submit, before the amendment is acted upon, either a statement prepared by the organization, stating that the amendment is not expected to have any actuarial impact on the workforce safety and insurance fund, or an actuarial impact statement prepared, at the expense of the organization, by the actuary employed by the organization.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 17; 1993, ch. 45, § 19; 1995, ch. 54, § 39; 1995, ch. 628, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

54-03-26.
Personal computers and associated software used by legislators — Fee — Continuing appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a member of the legislative assembly who is assigned a computer may use that computer and its associated equipment and software for any use that is not in violation of section 16.1-10-02 upon payment of a computer usage fee established by the legislative management.

The legislative management may establish a policy under which a member of the legislative assembly who has paid a computer usage fee under subsection 1 may purchase the computer used by that member for the appraised or market value of the computer upon the replacement of the computer by the legislative council.

Any funds received by the legislative council through the sale of a computer under subsection 2 must be deposited in the legislative services fund in the state treasury.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 436, § 1; 2009, ch. 457, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, §
41.

Note.

Section 54-03-26 was amended 2 times by the 2009 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 1 of chapter 457, Session Laws 2009, House Bill 1178; and section 41 of chapter 482, Session Laws 2009, House Bill 1436.

54-03-27.
Service in the legislative assembly — Leave of absence from employment.

The executive officer in charge of a state agency, department, or institution or the governing body of any political subdivision or any other employer in this state may grant a leave of absence from employment to a full-time employee of that governmental entity or of that employer who is a member of the legislative assembly for service during any regular or special session of the legislative assembly and for attendance at a meeting of the legislative management or any of its committees. The leave of absence may be without pay, and the employer may reduce or eliminate the payment of any additional benefits normally due the employee while the employee is performing legislative service. If the leave of absence is granted, the employer may not terminate the employment of an employee solely due to the fact that the employee is absent from employment as the result of service in the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 443, § 1; 2001, ch. 470, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 42.